Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.04.660.
Ownership of accountant’s working papers.

Statements, records, schedules, working papers, and memoranda made by a certified public accountant or a public accountant incident to or in the course of professional service to a client, except reports submitted to a client, are the property of the accountant, in the absence of an express agreement between the accountant and the client to the contrary. A statement, record, schedule, working paper, or memorandum may not be sold, transferred, or bequeathed to a person other than a partner of the accountant without the consent of the client or the client’s personal representative or assignee.

History.

(§ 20 ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 49 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Collateral references. —

Right of accountant to lien upon client’s books and records in former’s possession, 76 ALR2d 1322.

Ownership of, and literary property in, working papers and date of accountant, 90 ALR2d 784.

Privilege against self-incrimination as ground for refusal to produce noncorporate documents in possession of person asserting privilege but owned by another,
37 ALR3d 1373.

Self-incrimination with respect to production of partnership books or records, 17 ALR4th 1039.

Sec. 08.04.661.
Previous licensure.

A person holding a valid license as a public accountant under former AS

08.04.270

or a person holding a valid permit under former AS

08.04.390

on June 29, 1980, may continue to practice under the conditions imposed by statute and regulation on that date but that person is otherwise subject to this chapter. A license or permit effective under this section may be renewed under conditions imposed by statute and regulation that were in effect on June 29, 1980, except that any renewal fee required under this chapter applies.

History.

(§ 8 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 50 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 08.04.345. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 08.04.662.
Confidential communications.

A license holder, a permit holder, a practice privilege holder, an out-of-state exemption holder, or a partner, an officer, a shareholder, a member, or an employee of a license holder, a permit holder, an out-of-state exemption holder, or a practice privilege holder may not reveal information communicated to the license holder, permit holder, out-of-state exemption holder, or practice privilege holder by a client about a matter concerning which the client has employed the license holder, permit holder, out-of-state exemption holder, or practice privilege holder in a professional capacity. This section does not apply to

information required to be disclosed by the standards of the public accounting profession in reporting on the examination of financial statements;

the release of information the client has authorized the license holder, permit holder, out-of-state exemption holder, or practice privilege holder to reveal;

information revealed as part of the discovery of evidence related to a court or administrative proceeding or introduced in evidence in a court or administrative proceeding;

information revealed in ethical investigations conducted by private professional organizations;

information revealed in the course of a quality review under AS

08.04.426

; or

information disclosed

under applicable state or federal laws or regulations; or

as required by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.

Client information obtained by the board under (a)(3) — (6) of this section is confidential and is not a public record for purposes of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 20 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 51 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 36 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 74 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 31, 2018, added (a)(6), and made related changes; in (b), substituted “(a)(3) – (6)” for “(a)(3) – (5)” following “by the board under”.

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, throughout the section, deleted “, an out-of-state exemption holder”, or similar, following “holder”, and made a related change; in (5) substituted “peer review” for “quality review” following “course of a”.

Sec. 08.04.662.
Confidential communications.

A license holder, a permit holder, or a practice privilege holder or a partner, an officer, a shareholder, a member, or an employee of a license holder, a permit holder, or a practice privilege holder may not reveal information communicated to the license holder, permit holder or practice privilege holder by a client about a matter concerning which the client has employed the license holder, permit holder, or practice privilege holder in a professional capacity. This section does not apply to

information required to be disclosed by the standards of the public accounting profession in reporting on the examination of financial statements;

the release of information the client has authorized the license holder, permit holder, or practice privilege holder to reveal;

information revealed as part of the discovery of evidence related to a court or administrative proceeding or introduced in evidence in a court or administrative proceeding;

information revealed in ethical investigations conducted by private professional organizations;

information revealed in the course of a peer review under AS

08.04.426

; or

information disclosed

under applicable state or federal laws or regulations; or

as required by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.

Client information obtained by the board under (a)(3) — (6) of this section is confidential and is not a public record for purposes of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 20 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 51 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 36 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 74 SLA 2018; am § 36 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.670.
Construction.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision to any person or to any circumstances is invalid, the remainder is not affected.

History.

(§ 22 ch 187 SLA 1960)